Florida, session 2026, SB1144.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 16 17 Section 1.âSubsection (25) is added to section 39.301, 18 Florida Statutes, to read: 19 39.301âInitiation of protective investigations.â 20 (25)(a)âAn interview conducted pursuant to this section 21 must be audio or video recorded, using a body camera or other 22 reasonable means of recording, except in any of the following 23 circumstances: 24 1.âThe recording equipment malfunctions, and the 25 malfunction is not the result of a failure to maintain the 26 equipment properly or to provide adequate supplies for the 27 equipment. 28 2.âDue to circumstances that could not reasonably be 29 foreseen by the investigator, he or she does not have the 30 necessary recording equipment available. 31 (b)âA person who is charged with a criminal offense 32 involving the abuse or neglect of a child does not have standing 33 to object to an investigatorâs failure to comply with paragraph 34 (a). An investigatorâs failure to comply with paragraph (a) is 35 not grounds for precluding any statements made during an 36 interview which are otherwise admissible in a legal proceeding, 37 including a criminal or dependency proceeding. 38 (c)âA recording created pursuant to this section must be 39 retained for at least 5 years. 40 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.